src/Korektor/sr-Latn.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1459 Y 29
SFX 1459 ti ti
SFX 1459 ti dem
SFX 1459 ti deš
SFX 1459 ti de
SFX 1459 ti demo
SFX 1459 ti dete
SFX 1459 ti du
SFX 1459 ti nuo
SFX 1459 ti nula
SFX 1459 ti nulo
SFX 1459 ti nuli
SFX 1459 ti nule
SFX 1459 ti nuću
SFX 1459 ti nućeš
SFX 1459 ti nuće
SFX 1459 ti nućemo
SFX 1459 ti nućete
SFX 1459 ti nuće
SFX 1459 ti ni
SFX 1459 ti nimo
SFX 1459 ti nite
SFX 1459 ti nuh
SFX 1459 ti nu
SFX 1459 ti nuše
SFX 1459 ti nusmo
SFX 1459 ti nuste
SFX 1459 ti njahu
SFX 1459 ti nući
SFX 1459 ti nuvši

SFX 1460 Y 28
SFX 1460 lati lati
SFX 1460 lati lam
SFX 1460 lati laš
SFX 1460 lati la
SFX 1460 lati lamo
SFX 1460 lati late
SFX 1460 lati laju
SFX 1460 lati lao
SFX 1460 lati lala
SFX 1460 lati lalo
SFX 1460 lati lali
SFX 1460 lati lale
SFX 1460 lati laću
SFX 1460 lati laćeš
SFX 1460 lati laće
SFX 1460 lati laćemo
SFX 1460 lati laćete
SFX 1460 lati laće
SFX 1460 lati laj
SFX 1460 lati lajmo
SFX 1460 lati lajte
SFX 1460 lati lah
SFX 1460 lati la
SFX 1460 lati laše
SFX 1460 lati lasmo
SFX 1460 lati laste
SFX 1460 lati ljahu
SFX 1460 lati lavši

SFX 1461 Y 28
SFX 1461 ći ći
SFX 1461 ći gnem
SFX 1461 ći gneš
SFX 1461 ći gne
SFX 1461 ći gnemo
SFX 1461 ći gnete
SFX 1461 ći gnu
SFX 1461 ći gao
SFX 1461 ći gla
SFX 1461 ći glo
SFX 1461 ći gli
SFX 1461 ći gle
SFX 1461 ći gnuću
SFX 1461 ći gnućeš
SFX 1461 ći gnuće
SFX 1461 ći gnućemo
SFX 1461 ći gnućete
SFX 1461 ći gnuće
SFX 1461 ći gni
SFX 1461 ći gnimo
SFX 1461 ći gnite
SFX 1461 ći goh
SFX 1461 ći že
SFX 1461 ći goše
SFX 1461 ći gosmo
SFX 1461 ći goste
SFX 1461 ći gohu
SFX 1461 ći gavši

SFX 1462 Y 39
SFX 1462 sti sti
SFX 1462 sti nem
SFX 1462 sti neš
SFX 1462 sti ne
SFX 1462 sti nemo
SFX 1462 sti nete
SFX 1462 sti nu
SFX 1462 sti dem
SFX 1462 sti deš
SFX 1462 sti de
SFX 1462 sti demo
SFX 1462 sti dete
SFX 1462 sti du
SFX 1462 sti o
SFX 1462 sti la
SFX 1462 sti lo
SFX 1462 sti li
SFX 1462 sti le
SFX 1462 sti ću
SFX 1462 sti ćeš
SFX 1462 sti će
SFX 1462 sti ćemo
SFX 1462 sti ćete
SFX 1462 sti će
SFX 1462 sti ni
SFX 1462 sti nimo
SFX 1462 sti nite
SFX 1462 sti nuh
SFX 1462 sti nuše
SFX 1462 sti nusmo
SFX 1462 sti nuste
SFX 1462 sti doh
SFX 1462 sti doše
SFX 1462 sti dosmo
SFX 1462 sti doste
SFX 1462 sti đahu
SFX 1462 sti deći
SFX 1462 sti nući
SFX 1462 sti vši

SFX 1463 Y 29
SFX 1463 jeti jeti
SFX 1463 jeti jenem
SFX 1463 jeti jeneš
SFX 1463 jeti jene
SFX 1463 jeti jenemo
SFX 1463 jeti jenete
SFX 1463 jeti jenu
SFX 1463 jeti io
SFX 1463 jeti jela
SFX 1463 jeti jelo
SFX 1463 jeti jeli
SFX 1463 jeti jele
SFX 1463 jeti jeću
SFX 1463 jeti jećeš
SFX 1463 jeti jeće
SFX 1463 jeti jećemo
SFX 1463 jeti jećete
SFX 1463 jeti jeće
SFX 1463 jeti i
SFX 1463 jeti imo
SFX 1463 jeti ite
SFX 1463 jeti jeh
SFX 1463 jeti je
SFX 1463 jeti ješe
SFX 1463 jeti jesmo
SFX 1463 jeti jeste
SFX 1463 jeti enjahu
SFX 1463 jeti jenući
SFX 1463 jeti jevši

SFX 1464 Y 28
SFX 1464 ati ati
SFX 1464 ati im
SFX 1464 ati iš
SFX 1464 ati i
SFX 1464 ati imo
SFX 1464 ati ite
SFX 1464 ati e
SFX 1464 ati ao
SFX 1464 ati ala
SFX 1464 ati alo
SFX 1464 ati ali
SFX 1464 ati ale
SFX 1464 ati aću
SFX 1464 ati aćeš
SFX 1464 ati aće
SFX 1464 ati aćemo
SFX 1464 ati aćete
SFX 1464 ati aće
SFX 1464 ati i
SFX 1464 ati imo
SFX 1464 ati ite
SFX 1464 ati ah
SFX 1464 ati a
SFX 1464 ati aše
SFX 1464 ati asmo
SFX 1464 ati aste
SFX 1464 ati ahu
SFX 1464 ati avši

SFX 1465 Y 22
SFX 1465 ći ći
SFX 1465 ći gnem
SFX 1465 ći gneš
SFX 1465 ći gne
SFX 1465 ći gnemo
SFX 1465 ći gnete
SFX 1465 ći gnu
SFX 1465 ći gao
SFX 1465 ći gla
SFX 1465 ći glo
SFX 1465 ći gli
SFX 1465 ći gle
SFX 1465 ći gni
SFX 1465 ći gnimo
SFX 1465 ći gnite
SFX 1465 ći goh
SFX 1465 ći že
SFX 1465 ći goše
SFX 1465 ći gosmo
SFX 1465 ći goste
SFX 1465 ći gohu
SFX 1465 ći gavši

SFX 1466 Y 28
SFX 1466 iti iti
SFX 1466 iti ijem
SFX 1466 iti iješ
SFX 1466 iti ije
SFX 1466 iti ijemo
SFX 1466 iti ijete
SFX 1466 iti iju
SFX 1466 iti io
SFX 1466 iti ila
SFX 1466 iti ilo
SFX 1466 iti ili
SFX 1466 iti ile
SFX 1466 iti iću
SFX 1466 iti ićeš
SFX 1466 iti iće
SFX 1466 iti ićemo
SFX 1466 iti ićete
SFX 1466 iti iće
SFX 1466 iti ij
SFX 1466 iti ijmo
SFX 1466 iti ijte
SFX 1466 iti ih
SFX 1466 iti i
SFX 1466 iti iše
SFX 1466 iti ismo
SFX 1466 iti iste
SFX 1466 iti ihu
SFX 1466 iti ivši

SFX 1467 Y 28
SFX 1467 ći ći
SFX 1467 ći gnem
SFX 1467 ći gneš
SFX 1467 ći gne
SFX 1467 ći gnemo
SFX 1467 ći gnete
SFX 1467 ći gnu
SFX 1467 ći gao
SFX 1467 ći gla
SFX 1467 ći glo
SFX 1467 ći gli
SFX 1467 ći gle
SFX 1467 ći gnuću
SFX 1467 ći gnućeš
SFX 1467 ći gnuće
SFX 1467 ći gnućemo
SFX 1467 ći gnućete
SFX 1467 ći gnuće
SFX 1467 ći gni
SFX 1467 ći gnimo
SFX 1467 ći gnite
SFX 1467 ći goh
SFX 1467 ći že
SFX 1467 ći goše
SFX 1467 ći gosmo
SFX 1467 ći goste
SFX 1467 ći žahu
SFX 1467 ći gnuvši

SFX 1468 Y 28
SFX 1468 deti deti
SFX 1468 deti dim
SFX 1468 deti diš
SFX 1468 deti di
SFX 1468 deti dimo
SFX 1468 deti dite
SFX 1468 deti de
SFX 1468 deti deo
SFX 1468 deti dela
SFX 1468 deti delo
SFX 1468 deti deli
SFX 1468 deti dele
SFX 1468 deti deću
SFX 1468 deti dećeš
SFX 1468 deti deće
SFX 1468 deti dećemo
SFX 1468 deti dećete
SFX 1468 deti deće
SFX 1468 deti di
SFX 1468 deti dimo
SFX 1468 deti dite
SFX 1468 deti deh
SFX 1468 deti de
SFX 1468 deti deše
SFX 1468 deti desmo
SFX 1468 deti deste
SFX 1468 deti đahu
SFX 1468 deti devši

SFX 1469 Y 28
SFX 1469 jeti jeti
SFX 1469 jeti im
SFX 1469 jeti iš
SFX 1469 jeti i
SFX 1469 jeti imo
SFX 1469 jeti ite
SFX 1469 jeti e
SFX 1469 jeti io
SFX 1469 jeti jela
SFX 1469 jeti jelo
SFX 1469 jeti jeli
SFX 1469 jeti jele
SFX 1469 jeti jeću
SFX 1469 jeti jećeš
SFX 1469 jeti jeće
SFX 1469 jeti jećemo
SFX 1469 jeti jećete
SFX 1469 jeti jeće
SFX 1469 jeti i
SFX 1469 jeti imo
SFX 1469 jeti ite
SFX 1469 jeti jeh
SFX 1469 jeti je
SFX 1469 jeti ješe
SFX 1469 jeti jesmo
SFX 1469 jeti jeste
SFX 1469 jeti enjahu
SFX 1469 jeti jevši

SFX 1470 Y 28
SFX 1470 rati rati
SFX 1470 rati erem
SFX 1470 rati ereš
SFX 1470 rati ere
SFX 1470 rati eremo
SFX 1470 rati erete
SFX 1470 rati eru
SFX 1470 rati rao
SFX 1470 rati rala
SFX 1470 rati ralo
SFX 1470 rati rali
SFX 1470 rati rale
SFX 1470 rati raću
SFX 1470 rati raćeš
SFX 1470 rati raće
SFX 1470 rati raćemo
SFX 1470 rati raćete
SFX 1470 rati raće
SFX 1470 rati eri
SFX 1470 rati erimo
SFX 1470 rati erite
SFX 1470 rati rah
SFX 1470 rati ra
SFX 1470 rati raše
SFX 1470 rati rasmo
SFX 1470 rati raste
SFX 1470 rati rahu
SFX 1470 rati ravši

SFX 1471 Y 28
SFX 1471 jati jati
SFX 1471 jati jem
SFX 1471 jati ješ
SFX 1471 jati je
SFX 1471 jati jemo
SFX 1471 jati jete
SFX 1471 jati ju
SFX 1471 jati jao
SFX 1471 jati jala
SFX 1471 jati jalo
SFX 1471 jati jali
SFX 1471 jati jale
SFX 1471 jati jaću
SFX 1471 jati jaćeš
SFX 1471 jati jaće
SFX 1471 jati jaćemo
SFX 1471 jati jaćete
SFX 1471 jati jaće
SFX 1471 jati j
SFX 1471 jati jmo
SFX 1471 jati jte
SFX 1471 jati jah
SFX 1471 jati ja
SFX 1471 jati jaše
SFX 1471 jati jasmo
SFX 1471 jati jaste
SFX 1471 jati jahu
SFX 1471 jati javši

SFX 1472 Y 22
SFX 1472 ći ći
SFX 1472 ći đem
SFX 1472 ći đeš
SFX 1472 ći đe
SFX 1472 ći đemo
SFX 1472 ći đete
SFX 1472 ći đu
SFX 1472 ći šao
SFX 1472 ći šla
SFX 1472 ći šlo
SFX 1472 ći šli
SFX 1472 ći šle
SFX 1472 ći đi
SFX 1472 ći đimo
SFX 1472 ći đite
SFX 1472 ći đoh
SFX 1472 ći đe
SFX 1472 ći đoše
SFX 1472 ći đosmo
SFX 1472 ći đoste
SFX 1472 ći đahu
SFX 1472 ći šavši

SFX 1473 Y 29
SFX 1473 jati jati
SFX 1473 jati jim
SFX 1473 jati jiš
SFX 1473 jati ji
SFX 1473 jati jimo
SFX 1473 jati jite
SFX 1473 jati je
SFX 1473 jati jao
SFX 1473 jati jala
SFX 1473 jati jalo
SFX 1473 jati jali
SFX 1473 jati jale
SFX 1473 jati jaću
SFX 1473 jati jaćeš
SFX 1473 jati jaće
SFX 1473 jati jaćemo
SFX 1473 jati jaćete
SFX 1473 jati jaće
SFX 1473 jati j
SFX 1473 jati jmo
SFX 1473 jati jte
SFX 1473 jati jah
SFX 1473 jati ja
SFX 1473 jati ja
SFX 1473 jati jaše
SFX 1473 jati jasmo
SFX 1473 jati jaste
SFX 1473 jati jahu
SFX 1473 jati javši
