src/Korektor/sr-Latn.dic
deti/1459
dići/1461
djesti/1462
djeti/1463
dobeći/1465
dobjeći/1467
dobrodoći/1472
dobrojati/1473
doviti/1466
dogrejati/1471
dogudeti/1468
dogudjeti/1469
dolebdjeti/1469
doležati/1464
dosmrdeti/1468
dosmrdjeti/1469
dostajati/1471
doći/1472
zabiti/1466
zabludeti/1468
zabludjeti/1469
zabrijati/1471
zabrojati/1473
zabrujati/1464
zaverglati/1460
zaviti/1466
zavredeti/1468
zavrijedjeti/1469
zagrajati/1471
zagrijati/1471
zagudeti/1468
zadaždjeti/1469
zadobiti/1466
zadrečati/1464
zazvrčati/1464
zaići/1472
zakmečati/1464
zakričati/1464
zalebdjeti/1469
zaleći/1461
zaludeti/1468
zamajati/1471
zamumlati/1460
zanjištati/1464
zaobići/1472
zaprati/1470
zapreći/1461
zaprštati/1464
zarudjeti/1469
zasedeti/1468
zasmejati/1471
zasmrdjeti/1469
zasrati/1470
zastideti/1468
zastrčati/1464
zastudjeti/1469
zaći/1472
zaćutati/1464
zaceptati/1464
zašiti/1466
zaštedeti/1468
zašuštati/1464
zbjeći/1467
zbrati/1470
zbrijati/1471
zbrojati/1473
zgomilati/1460
zgrijati/1471
zdrati/1470
izabrati/1470
izaprati/1470
izaći/1472
izbiflati/1460
izbjeći/1467
izblijedeti/1468
izblijedjeti/1469
izbrati/1470
izbrijati/1471
izbrojati/1473
izverglati/1460
izviti/1466
izvredeti/1468
izvrći/1461
izguglati/1460
izdići/1461
izdrati/1470
izdržati/1464
izići/1472
izlajati/1471
izleći/1461
izludjeti/1469
izmalati/1460
izmiti/1466
izmoći/1461
izmumlati/1460
iznaći/1472
iskovrčati/1464
ismejati/1471
ispeglati/1460
ispilati/1460
ispiti/1466
isprati/1470
isprdeti/1468
israti/1470
išmirglati/1460
mimoići/1472
nabiti/1466
nabiflati/1460
nabrati/1470
nabrojati/1473
navejati/1471
naverglati/1460
naviti/1466
nagomilati/1460
nadbiti/1466
nadbrojati/1473
nadviti/1466
nadzviždati/1464
nadoći/1472
nadrati/1470
naždrati/1470
naići/1472
nalajati/1471
naležati/1464
naleći/1461
namalati/1460
napeglati/1460
naprati/1470
nasjedjeti/1469
nasmejati/1471
naći/1472
našiti/1466
obiti/1466
obići/1472
obnevideti/1468
obrati/1470
ovejati/1471
oguglati/1460
odbeći/1461
odbiti/1466
odbjeći/1467
odbrati/1470
odbrojati/1473
odverglati/1460
odgomilati/1460
odgrejati/1471
odguglati/1460
odići/1461
odležati/1464
odmalati/1460
odmoći/1461
odmumlati/1460
odsedeti/1468
odsjedjeti/1469
odstojati/1473
olajati/1471
opeglati/1460
oprati/1470
opseći/1461
opšiti/1466
orudeti/1468
otklečati/1464
pobeći/1465
pobjeći/1467
pobledeti/1468
poblijedjeti/1469
pobrojati/1473
poviti/1466
pograjati/1471
podviti/1466
podvrći/1461
podleći/1461
podržati/1464
podsaviti/1466
podsmejati/1471
poždrati/1470
požudeti/1468
pozavidjeti/1469
poizdići/1461
poleći/1461
poludeti/1468
pomalati/1460
pomrčati/1464
popridići/1461
poprileći/1461
posedeti/1468
posejati/1471
posijedjeti/1469
posrati/1470
postideti/1468
postidjeti/1469
poći/1472
pociglati/1460
prebdjeti/1469
prebeći/1461
prebjeći/1467
prebledeti/1468
prebrojati/1473
prevazići/1472
prevejati/1471
prevideti/1468
previdjeti/1469
previti/1466
predgrijati/1471
predstojati/1473
preležati/1464
prenagomilati/1460
prepilati/1460
prepoviti/1466
preprati/1470
presedeti/1468
presjedjeti/1469
prestojati/1473
preći/1472
pribeći/1461
pribjeći/1467
pribrati/1470
pribrijati/1471
pribrojati/1473
pridići/1461
pridobiti/1466
pridoći/1472
pridržati/1464
prileći/1461
pripeglati/1460
prisabrati/1470
prismrdeti/1468
prismrdjeti/1469
prići/1472
prišiti/1466
prištedeti/1468
prištedjeti/1469
problijedjeti/1469
probrati/1470
probuktati/1464
provejati/1471
provideti/1468
proždrati/1470
prozvrčati/1464
proizaći/1472
proizići/1472
prokreštati/1464
prolebdjeti/1469
proliptati/1464
promumlati/1460
pronaći/1472
prosedeti/1468
prosejati/1471
prosrati/1470
proći/1472
pročučati/1464
razaviti/1466
razbjeći/1467
razbrati/1470
razbrojati/1473
razvideti/1468
razvidjeti/1469
razvrći/1461
razgrijati/1471
razići/1472
razležati/1464
razleći/1461
razmimoići/1472
raspeglati/1460
raspoviti/1466
reizabrati/1470
sabiti/1466
saprati/1470
saći/1472
sašiti/1466
svrći/1461
sići/1472
smoći/1461
smumlati/1460
snaći/1472
ubazdjeti/1469
ubledeti/1468
ubrati/1470
ubridjeti/1469
ubrojati/1473
ugrejati/1471
udostojati/1473
uzaći/1472
uzbrati/1470
uzbučati/1464
uzviti/1466
uzdići/1461
uzići/1472
uzlajati/1471
uzlebdjeti/1469
uzmoći/1461
uznastojati/1473
uići/1472
uleći/1461
upiti/1466
upreći/1461
usmrdeti/1468
usmrdjeti/1469
uspiti/1466
usceptati/1464
utajati/1471
